New York, session 2025-2026, S8677.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 196-b of the labor law is amended 2 by adding a new paragraph c to read as follows: 3 c. An employer may not exclude employees who telecommute from the 4 provisions of the sick leave policy established by such employer for 5 employees who physically commute to the employer's work site. An employ- 6 ee who telecommutes shall accrue sick leave at the same rate and under 7 the same conditions that a comparable employee present at the employer's 8 work site would accrue it. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 10 law and shall apply to the accrual of paid sick leave on and after such 11 effective date. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 12 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 13 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 14 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13851-01-5